Nebraska, session 109, LB971.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB971 LB971
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, (a) any individual
or group sickness and accident insurance policy or subscriber contract
delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any
hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for
policies that provide coverage for a specified disease or other limited-
benefit coverage, and (b) any self-funded employee benefit plan to the
extent not preempted by federal law shall provide coverage for inhalers
for the treatment of asthma when prescribed by a licensed health care
practitioner.
(2) Coverage shall be provided for one form of rescue and one form
of maintenance inhaler that shall not be subject to a deductible,
copayment, coinsurance, or other cost-sharing arrangement. If the policy
is a high deductible health plan as defined in section 223(c)(2) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, such coverage may be subject to the plan's
annual deductible if application of this requirement would result in
ineligibility for a health savings account.
-2-